Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-708 Persons entitled to file initial
financing statement or continuation statement. A person may file an
initial financing statement or a continuation statement under this part if:

(1) The secured party of record authorizes the
filing; and

(2) The filing is necessary under this part:

(A) To continue the effectiveness of a
financing statement filed before this article takes effect; or

(B) To perfect or continue the perfection of
a security interest. [L 2000, c 241, pt of §1; ren L 2001, c 228, §14]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next